lex1.lexc
LEXICON irreg-bí
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+1PSg:táim				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+2PSg:tá				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+3PSg:tá				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+1PPl:táimid			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+2PPl:tá				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+3PPl:tá				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+Auto:táthar			#;
+Verb+Irreg+PresHab+1PSg:bím			#;
+Verb+Irreg+PresHab+2PSg:bíonn			#;
+Verb+Irreg+PresHab+3PSg:bíonn			#;
+Verb+Irreg+PresHab+1PPl:bímid			#;
+Verb+Irreg+PresHab+2PPl:bíonn			#;
+Verb+Irreg+PresHab+3PPl:bíonn			#;
+Verb+Irreg+PresHab+Auto:bítear			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+1PSg:bhí				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+2PSg:bhí				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+3PSg:bhí				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+1PPl:bhíomar			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+2PPl:bhí				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+3PPl:bhí				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+Auto:bhíothas			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+1PSg:beidh				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+2PSg:beidh				#;		
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+3PSg:beidh				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+1PPl:beimid				#;		
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+2PPl:beidh				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+3PPl:beidh				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+Auto:beifear			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+1PSg:bheinn				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+2PSg:bheifeá			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+3PSg:bheadh				#;		
+Verb+Irreg+Con+1PPl:bheimis			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+2PPl:bheadh				#;		
+Verb+Irreg+Con+3PPl:bheidís			#;	
+Verb+Irreg+Con+Auto:bheifí				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+1PSg:bhínn			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+2PSg:bhiteá			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+3PSg:bhíodh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+1PPl:bhímis			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+2PPl:bhíodh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+3PPl:bhídís			#;		
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+Auto:bhítí			#;

LEXICON irreg-clois
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+1PSg:cloisim			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+2PSg:cloiseann			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+3PSg:cloiseann			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+1PPl:cloisimid			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+2PPl:cloiseann			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+3PPl:cloiseann			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+Auto:cloistear			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+1PSg:chuala			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+2PSg:chuala			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+3PSg:chuala			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+1PPl:chualamar			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+2PPl:chuala			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+3PPl:chuala			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+Auto:chualathas		#;		
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+1PSg:cloisfidh			#;	
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+2PSg:cloisfidh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+3PSg:cloisfidh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+1PPl:cloisfimid			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+2PPl:cloisfidh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+3PPl:cloisfidh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+Auto:cloisfear			#;	
+Verb+Irreg+Con+1PSg:chloisfinn			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+2PSg:chloisfeá			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+3PSg:chloisfeadh		#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+1PPl:chloisfimis		#;		
+Verb+Irreg+Con+2PPl:chloisfeadh		#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+3PPl:chloisfidís		#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+Auto:chloisfí			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+1PSg:chloisinn		#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+2PSg:chloisteá		#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+3PSg:chloiseadh		#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+1PPl:chloisimis		#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+2PPl:chloiseadh		#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+3PPl:chloisidís		#;	
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+Auto:chloistí		#;	

LEXICON irreg-déan
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+1PSg:déanaim			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+2PSg:déanann			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+3PSg:déanann			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+1PPl:déanaimid			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+2PPl:déanann			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+3PPl:déanann			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+Auto:déantar			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+1PSg:rinne				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+2PSg:rinne				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+3PSg:rinne				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+1PPl:rinneamar			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+2PPl:rinne				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+3PPl:rinne				#;		
+Verb+Irreg+Past+Auto:rinneadh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+1PSg:déanfaidh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+2PSg:déanfaidh			#;	
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+3PSg:déanfaidh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+1PPl:déanfaimid			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+2PPl:déanfaidh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+3PPl:déanfaidh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+Auto:déanfar			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+1PSg:dhéanfainn			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+2PSg:dhéanfá			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+3PSg:dhéanfadh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+1PPl:dhéanfaimis		#;	
+Verb+Irreg+Con+2PPl:dhéanfadh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+3PPl:dhéanfaidís		#;	
+Verb+Irreg+Con+Auto:dhéanfaí			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+1PSg:dhéanainn		#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+2PSg:dhéantá			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+3PSg:dhéanadh		#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+1PPl:dhéanaimis		#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+2PPl:dhéanadh		#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+3PPl:dhéanaidís		#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+Auto:dhéantaí		#;

LEXICON irreg-faigh
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+1PSg:faighim			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+2PSg:faigheann			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+3PSg:faigheann			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+1PPl:faighimid			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+2PPl:faigheann			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+3PPl:faigheann			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+Auto:faightear			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+1PSg:fuair				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+2PSg:fuair				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+3PSg:fuair				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+1PPl:fuaireamar		#;	
+Verb+Irreg+Past+2PPl:fuair				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+3PPl:fuair				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+Auto:fuarthas			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+1PSg:gheobhaidh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+2PSg:gheobhaidh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+3PSg:gheobhaidh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+1PPl:gheobhaimid		#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+2PPl:gheobhaidh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+3PPl:gheobhaidh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+Auto:gheofar			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+1PSg:gheobhainn			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+2PSg:gheofá				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+3PSg:gheobhadh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+1PPl:gheobhaimis		#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+2PPl:gheobhadh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+3PPl:gheobhaidís		#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+Auto:gheofaí			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+1PSg:d'fhaighinn		#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+2PSg:d'fhaighteá		#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+3PSg:d'fhaigheadh	#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+1PPl:d'fhaighimis	#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+2PPl:d'fhaigheadh	#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+3PPl:d'fhaighidís	#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+Auto:d'fhaightí		#;

LEXICON irreg-feic
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+1PSg:feicim			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+2PSg:feiceann			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+3PSg:feiceann			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+1PPl:feicimid			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+2PPl:feiceann			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+3PPl:feiceann			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+Auto:feictear			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+1PSg:chonaic			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+2PSg:chonaic			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+3PSg:chonaic			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+1PPl:chonaiceamar		#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+2PPl:chonaic			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+3PPl:chonaic			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+Auto:chonacthas		#;		
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+1PSg:feicfidh			#;	
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+2PSg:feicfidh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+3PSg:feicfidh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+1PPl:feicfimid			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+2PPl:feicfidh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+3PPl:feicfidh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+Auto:feicfear			#;	
+Verb+Irreg+Con+1PSg:d'fheicfainn		#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+2PSg:d'fheicfeá			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+3PSg:d'fheicfeadh		#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+1PPl:d'fheicfimis		#;		
+Verb+Irreg+Con+2PPl:d'fheicfeadh		#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+3PPl:d'fheicfidís		#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+Auto:d'fheicfí			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+1PSg:d'fheicinn		#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+2PSg:d'fheicteá		#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+3PSg:d'fheiceadh		#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+1PPl:d'fheicimis		#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+2PPl:d'fheiceadh		#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+3PPl:d'fheicidís		#;	
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+Auto:d'fheictí		#;

LEXICON irreg-ith
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+1PSg:ithim				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+2PSg:itheann			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+3PSg:itheann			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+1PPl:ithimid			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+2PPl:itheann			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+3PPl:itheann			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+Auto:itear				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+1PSg:d'ith				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+2PSg:d'ith				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+3PSg:d'ith				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+1PPl:d'itheamar		#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+2PPl:d'ith				#;	
+Verb+Irreg+Past+3PPl:d'ith				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+Auto:itheadh			#;		
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+1PSg:íosfaidh			#;	
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+2PSg:íosfaidh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+3PSg:íosfaidh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+1PPl:íosfaimid			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+2PPl:íosfaidh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+3PPl:íosfaidh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+Auto:íosfar				#;	
+Verb+Irreg+Con+1PSg:d'íosfainn			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+2PSg:d'íosfá			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+3PSg:d'íosfadh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+1PPl:d'íosfaimis		#;		
+Verb+Irreg+Con+2PPl:d'íosfadh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+3PPl:d'íosfaidís		#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+Auto:d'íósfaí			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+1PSg:d'ithinn		#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+2PSg:d'iteá			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+3PSg:d'itheadh		#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+1PPl:d'ithimis		#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+2PPl:d'itheadh		#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+3PPl:d'ithidís		#;	
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+Auto:d'ití			#;

LEXICON Verbs
irreg-bí;				! to be
irreg-clois;			! to hear
irreg-déan;				! to make/do
irreg-faigh;			! to get
irreg-feic;				! to see
irreg-ith;				! to eat
